Louisiana, session 2026, SB125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:572.8(H)(2) and (Q) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§572.8. Compensation for wrongful conviction and imprisonment; petition process;
compensation; proof; assignment of powers and duties
* * *
H.(1) * * *
(2)(a) Compensation for the physical harm and injury suffered by the
petitioner shall be calculated at a rate of twenty-five thousand dollars per year
incarcerated, not to exceed a maximum total amount of two hundred fifty thousand
dollars, to be paid at a rate of twenty-five thousand dollars annually.
(b) After July 1, 2022, through July thirty-first of the calendar year in
which this Act becomes effective, compensation for the physical harm and injury
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 125 ENROLLED
suffered by the petitioner shall be calculated at a rate of forty thousand dollars per
year incarcerated, not to exceed a maximum total amount of four hundred thousand
dollars, to be paid at a rate of forty thousand dollars annually.
(c) Beginning August first of the calendar year in which this Act becomes
effective, compensation for the physical harm and injury suffered by the
petitioner shall be calculated at a rate of forty thousand dollars per year
incarcerated, not to exceed a maximum total amount of six hundred thousand
dollars, to be paid at a rate of forty thousand dollars annually.
(d) Any petitioner who has not previously been awarded compensation
pursuant to the provisions of this Section who files a petition seeking compensation
on or after July 1, 2022, has the option to receive a lump sum payment in the amount
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars in lieu of receiving forty thousand dollars
annually.
* * *
Q. Beginning July 1, 2022, August first of the calendar year in which this
Act becomes effective, any petitioner who has been awarded compensation by the
court pursuant to the provisions of this Section, on or after September 1, 2005, and
prior to July 1, 2022, August first of the calendar year in which this Act becomes
effective, may file a petition seeking supplemental compensation in the amount
authorized by the provisions of Subparagraph (H)(2)(b)(c) of this Section. The
petitioner shall file a petition seeking supplemental compensation on or before July
1, 2023, August first of the calendar year following the calendar year in which
this Act becomes effective, or be forever barred from filing a supplemental petition.
Any compensation awarded pursuant to this Subsection shall be awarded at a rate of
forty thousand dollars annually.
* * *
Section 2.(A) The provisions of Section 1 of this Act shall become effective when
an Act of the Louisiana Legislature containing a specific appropriation of monies for the
implementation of the provisions of this Act becomes effective.
(B) The provisions of this Section shall become effective upon signature by the
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 125 ENROLLED
governor or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become
law without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the
legislature, the provisions of this Section shall become effective on the day following such
approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.